Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.121, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Higher education assets growth account. new text end new text begin The higher education assets growth account is created in the special revenue fund in the state treasury. Unless otherwise appropriated, money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner for the state grant program under this section. Earnings, including interest, dividends, and any other earnings arising from the assets of the account, are credited to the account. Money remaining in the account at the end of a fiscal year is not canceled to the general fund but remains available until expended. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [290.0334] EXCISE TAX BASED ON ASSETS GROWTH OF COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Applicable educational institution" means an educational institution: new text end new text begin (1) with total assets at any time during the taxable year in excess of $100,000,000; new text end new text begin (2) having at least 500 tuition-paying students during the preceding taxable year; and new text end new text begin (3) having more than 50 percent of tuition-paying students located in Minnesota during the taxable year. new text end new text begin (c) "Asset growth" means the positive difference between the value of assets at the close of the current taxable year and the value of assets at the close of the immediately preceding taxable year. new text end new text begin (d) "Assets" means assets used directly in carrying out an applicable educational institution's exempt purpose, as provided in Code of Federal Regulations, title 26, section 53.4968-1(b)(5) (2020). new text end new text begin (e) "Educational institution" has the meaning given in section 25A(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin (f) "Per-student assets" means the value of an applicable educational institution's assets at the close of the current taxable year divided by the number of tuition-paying students at the close of the current taxable year. new text end new text begin (g) "Related organization" has the meaning given in section 4968(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Tax imposed. new text end new text begin In addition to any other tax imposed under this chapter, a tax equal to the percentages listed in subdivision 3 is imposed on the asset growth of an applicable educational institution. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Rates of tax. new text end new text begin The tax under subdivision 2 is imposed as follows: new text end new text begin (1) for per-student assets over $74,999 but not over $150,000, 15 percent; new text end new text begin (2) for per-student assets over $150,000 but not over $250,000, 20 percent; and new text end new text begin (3) for per-student assets over $250,000, 25 percent. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Other provisions apply. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clauses (1) and (2), the provisions of section 4968(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code apply. new text end new text begin (b) Assets of related organizations of educational institutions are treated as assets of the educational institution, except that: new text end new text begin (1) assets of an educational institution do not include assets of a related organization; and new text end new text begin (2) unless the related organization is controlled by the educational institution or is an organization described in section 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, assets not intended or available for use or benefit of the educational institution are excluded from the calculation of per-student endowment growth differential. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin The audit, assessment, refund, penalty, interest, enforcement, collection remedies, appeal, and administrative provisions of chapters 270C and 289A that are applicable to taxes imposed under this chapter apply to the tax imposed under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Returns; payment of tax. new text end new text begin (a) An applicable educational institution must report the tax on a return prescribed by the commissioner and must remit the tax in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) Interest must be paid on an overpayment refunded or credited to the taxpayer from the date of payment of the tax until the date the refund is paid or credited. For purposes of this subdivision, the date of payment is the due date of the return or the date of actual payment of the tax, whichever is later. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Deposit of revenues; account established. new text end new text begin The commissioner must deposit the revenues, including penalties and interest, minus any refunds, derived from the tax imposed by this section in the higher education assets growth account in the special revenue fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end